Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-20,194
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Conversion; plan.

(1) Pursuant to
a plan of conversion, a domestic corporation may convert into a domestic limited
liability company pursuant to this section, sections 21-170 to 21-184, and
sections 21-20,195 to 21-20,197, or may convert to a foreign limited liability
company pursuant to this section, sections 21-20,195 to 21-20,197, and the
laws under which the foreign limited liability company is formed.

(2) A plan
of conversion shall be in a record and shall include all of the following:

(a) The name
of the domestic corporation before conversion;

(b) The name and form
of the converted entity after conversion;

(c) The terms and conditions of the conversion,
including the manner and basis for converting the shares of the corporation
into any combination of obligations, interests, or rights in the converted
entity or other consideration; and

(d) The organizational documents of the
converted entity.

(3) For purposes of this section, record means information that
is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other
medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

Laws 2012, LB1018, § 5.